Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:A public institution of higher education that allows any demonstration, riot, or other activity that disrupts the normal educational process, and which causes destruction of property at the institution is prohibited from spending any state appropriated funds or funds received from tuition and fees to repair the damage.--- END ---